Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-126.06
County court; matters relating to trusts; fees.

The county court shall be entitled to collect the following fees: For the registration of any trust, whether testamentary or not, twenty-two dollars; for each proceeding initiated in county court concerning the administration and distribution of trusts, the declaration of rights, and the determination of other matters involving trustees and beneficiaries of trusts, twenty-two dollars; for the appointment of a successor trustee, twenty-two dollars; and for filing and recording each report, five dollars. Two dollars of each twenty-two-dollar fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges through June 30, 2021. Beginning July 1, 2021, four dollars of each twenty-two-dollar fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges.

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 27;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 37;

Laws 1989, LB 233, § 9;

Laws 2005, LB 348, § 16;

Laws 2021, LB17, § 11.